Utah statutes.
41-12a-601.   Collusive transfers prohibited.

If an owner's registration has been suspended under this chapter, the registration may not be transferred nor the motor vehicle registered in any other name until the department is satisfied that the transfer or registration is proposed in good faith and not with the intent or the effect of defeating the purposes of this chapter.  This section does not affect the rights of a conditional vendor, chattel mortgagee, or lessor of a motor vehicle registered in the name of another as owner who becomes subject to the provisions of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

